Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 4. EXECUTIVE BRANCH

SUBTITLE I. HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES

CHAPTER 545. CERTAIN PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS

SUBCHAPTER A. PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATION AND SERVICE DELIVERY INTEGRATION

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this subchapter:

(1) "Integrated system" means the integrated eligibility determination and service delivery system that is implemented under the integration plan.

(2) "Integration plan" means the plan to integrate services and functions relating to eligibility determination and service delivery required by Section 545.0002.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0002. DEVELOPMENT AND IMPLEMENTATION OF INTEGRATION PLAN. (a) The commission, subject to the approval of the governor and the Legislative Budget Board, shall develop and implement a plan to integrate services and functions relating to eligibility determination and service delivery by health and human services agencies, the Texas Workforce Commission, and other agencies. The integration plan must include:

(1) a reengineering of eligibility determination business processes;

(2) streamlined service delivery;

(3) a unified and integrated process for the transition from welfare to work; and

(4) improved access to benefits and services for clients.

(b) In developing and implementing the integration plan, the commission:

(1) shall give priority to the design and development of computer hardware and software for and provide technical support relating to the integrated eligibility determination system;

(2) shall consult with agencies whose programs are included in the plan, including the Department of State Health Services and the Texas Workforce Commission; and

(3) may contract for appropriate professional and technical assistance.

(c) The commission shall develop and implement the integrated system to achieve:

(1) increased quality of and client access to services; and

(2) savings in the cost of providing administrative and other services and staff as a result of streamlining and eliminating duplication of services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0003. METHODS TO ADDRESS FRAUD AND ELIGIBILITY ERROR RATE. The commission shall examine cost-effective methods to address:

(1) fraud in assistance programs; and

(2) the error rate in eligibility determination.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0004. CONTRACT FOR INTEGRATION PLAN IMPLEMENTATION. (a) On receipt by this state of any necessary federal approval and subject to the approval of the governor and the Legislative Budget Board, the commission may contract to implement all or part of the integration plan if the commission determines that contracting:

(1) may advance the objectives of Sections 545.0002 and 545.0006(b); and

(2) meets the criteria set out in the cost-benefit analysis described by this section.

(b) Before awarding a contract, the commission shall provide to the governor and the Legislative Budget Board a detailed cost-benefit analysis that demonstrates:

(1) the integration plan's cost-effectiveness;

(2) mechanisms for monitoring performance under the plan; and

(3) specific improvements the plan makes to the service delivery system and client access.

(c) The commission shall make the cost-benefit analysis described by Subsection (b) available to the public.

(d) On or before the 10th day after releasing a request for bids, proposals, offers, or other applicable expressions of interest relating to developing or implementing the integration plan, the commission shall hold a public hearing and receive public comment on the request.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0005. USE OF OTHER AGENCIES' STAFF AND RESOURCES. (a) The commission, in developing and implementing the integration plan, may use the staff and resources of agencies whose programs are included in the plan.

(b) The agencies whose programs are included in the integration plan shall cooperate with a commission request to provide available staff and resources that will be subject to the commission's direction.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0006. FUNDING. (a) The design, development, and operation of an automated data processing system to support the integration plan may be financed through the issuance of bonds or other obligations under Chapter 1232.

(b) The commission, subject to any spending limitation prescribed in the General Appropriations Act, may use savings described by Section 545.0002(c)(2) to further develop the integrated system and provide other health and human services.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER B. ADMINISTRATION OF CERTAIN PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS PROGRAMS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0051. CONSOLIDATED RECIPIENT IDENTIFICATION AND BENEFITS ISSUANCE METHOD. (a) If the commission determines that the implementation would be feasible and cost-effective, the commission may develop and implement a method to consolidate, to the extent possible, recipient identification and benefits issuance for the commission and health and human services agencies.

(b) The method may:

(1) provide for the use of a single integrated benefits issuance card or multiple cards capable of integrating benefits issuance or other program functions;

(2) incorporate a fingerprint image identifier to enable personal identity verification at a point of service and reduce fraud;

(3) enable immediate electronic verification of recipient eligibility; and

(4) replace multiple forms, cards, or other methods used for fraud reduction or provision of health and human services benefits, including:

(A) electronic benefits transfer cards; and

(B) smart cards used in Medicaid.

(c) In developing and implementing the method, the commission shall:

(1) to the extent possible, use industry-standard communication, messaging, and electronic benefits transfer protocols;

(2) ensure that all identifying and descriptive information of recipients of each health and human services program included in the method can be accessed only by a provider or other entity participating in the particular program;

(3) ensure that a provider or other entity participating in a health and human services program included in the method cannot identify whether a program recipient is receiving benefits under another program included in the method; and

(4) ensure that the storage and communication of all identifying and descriptive information included in the method comply with existing federal and state privacy laws governing individually identifiable information for recipients of public benefits programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0052. EXPANSION OF BILLING COORDINATION AND INFORMATION COLLECTION ACTIVITIES. (a) If cost-effective, the commission may:

(1) contract to expand all or part of the billing coordination system established under Section 532.0058 to process claims for services provided through other benefits programs the commission or a health and human services agency administers;

(2) expand any other billing coordination tools and resources used to process claims for health care services provided through Medicaid to process claims for services provided through other benefits programs the commission or a health and human services agency administers; and

(3) expand the scope of individuals about whom information is collected under Section 32.042, Human Resources Code, to include recipients of services provided through other benefits programs the commission or a health and human services agency administers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other state law, each health and human services agency shall provide the commission with information necessary to allow the commission or the commission's designee to perform the billing coordination and information collection activities authorized by this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0053. SERVICE DELIVERY AREA ALIGNMENT. Notwithstanding Section 540.0701(d) or any other law and to the extent possible, the commission shall align Medicaid and the child health plan program service delivery areas.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0054. PROGRAM TO IMPROVE AND MONITOR CERTAIN OUTCOMES OF MEDICAID RECIPIENTS AND CHILD HEALTH PLAN PROGRAM ENROLLEES. The commission may design and implement a program to improve and monitor clinical and functional outcomes of a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee. The program may use financial, clinical, and other criteria based on pharmacy, medical services, and other claims data related to Medicaid or the child health plan program.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0055. MINIMUM COLLECTION GOAL FOR RECOVERY OF CERTAIN BENEFITS. (a) Not later than August 30 of each year, the executive commissioner by rule shall set a minimum goal for the commission specifying the percentage of the amount of benefits the commission granted in error under the supplemental nutrition assistance program under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code, or the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code, that the commission should recover. The executive commissioner shall set the percentage based on:

(1) comparable recovery rates other states reported; or

(2) other appropriate factors the executive commissioner identifies.

(b) If the commission fails to meet the goal set under Subsection (a) for the fiscal year, the executive commissioner shall notify the comptroller, and the comptroller shall reduce the commission's general revenue appropriation by an amount equal to the difference between the amount of state funds the commission would have collected had the commission met the goal and the amount of state funds the commission actually collected.

(c) The executive commissioner, the governor, and the Legislative Budget Board shall monitor the commission's performance in meeting the goal set under Subsection (a). The commission shall cooperate by providing to the governor and the Legislative Budget Board, on request, information concerning the commission's collection efforts.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0056. DISTRIBUTION OF EARNED INCOME TAX CREDIT INFORMATION. (a) The commission shall ensure that educational materials relating to the federal earned income tax credit are provided in accordance with this section to each individual receiving assistance or benefits under:

(1) the child health plan program;

(2) the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code;

(3) Medicaid;

(4) the supplemental nutrition assistance program under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code; or

(5) another appropriate health and human services program.

(b) In accordance with Section 526.0002, the commission shall, by mail or through the Internet, provide an individual described by Subsection (a) with access to:

(1) Internal Revenue Service publications relating to the federal earned income tax credit or information the comptroller prepares under Section 403.025 relating to that credit;

(2) federal income tax forms necessary to claim the federal earned income tax credit; and

(3) where feasible, the location of at least one program that:

(A) is in close geographic proximity to the individual; and

(B) provides free federal income tax preparation services to low-income and other eligible persons.

(c) In January of each year, the commission or a commission representative shall mail to each individual described by Subsection (a) information about the federal earned income tax credit that provides the individual with referrals to the resources described by Subsection (b).

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0057. APPLICATION ASSISTANCE FOR FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE RECIPIENTS ELIGIBLE FOR FEDERAL PROGRAMS. The commission shall assist recipients of financial assistance under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code, who are eligible for assistance under federal programs to apply for benefits under those federal programs. The commission may delegate this responsibility to a health and human services agency, contract with a unit of local government, or use any other cost-effective method to assist financial assistance recipients who are eligible for federal programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER C. CERTAIN PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0101. MEMORANDUM OF UNDERSTANDING REGARDING MEDICAID AND CHILD HEALTH PLAN PROGRAM ELIGIBILITY DETERMINATIONS FOR CERTAIN CHILDREN. (a) The commission shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Texas Juvenile Justice Department to ensure that the commission assesses each individual who is committed, placed, or detained under Title 3, Family Code, for Medicaid and child health plan program eligibility before that individual's release from commitment, placement, or detention. A local juvenile probation department is subject to the requirements of the memorandum.

(b) The memorandum of understanding must specify:

(1) the information that must be provided to the commission;

(2) the process by which and time frame within which the information must be provided; and

(3) the roles and responsibilities of all parties to the memorandum, including a requirement that the commission pursue the actions necessary to complete eligibility applications.

(c) The memorandum of understanding must be tailored to:

(1) achieve the goal of ensuring that an individual described by Subsection (a) who the commission determines is eligible for Medicaid or the child health plan program:

(A) is enrolled in the program for which the individual is eligible; and

(B) may begin receiving services through the program as soon as possible after the eligibility determination is made; and

(2) if possible, achieve the goal of ensuring that the individual may begin receiving services through the program on the date of the individual's release from commitment, placement, or detention.

(d) The executive commissioner may adopt rules as necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0102. VERIFICATION OF IMMIGRATION STATUS OF CERTAIN APPLICANTS FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS. (a) This section applies only with respect to the following benefits programs:

(1) the child health plan program under Chapter 62, Health and Safety Code;

(2) the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code;

(3) Medicaid; and

(4) the supplemental nutrition assistance program under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code.

(b) If an individual states at the time of application for benefits under a program to which this section applies that the individual is a qualified alien, as that term is defined by 8 U.S.C. Section 1641(b), the commission shall, to the extent allowed by federal law, verify information regarding the individual's immigration status using an automated system where available.

(c) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

(d) Nothing in this section adds to or changes the eligibility requirements for a benefits program to which this section applies.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0103. VERIFICATION OF SPONSORSHIP INFORMATION FOR CERTAIN BENEFITS RECIPIENTS OR ENROLLEES; REIMBURSEMENT. (a) In this section, "sponsored alien" means an individual who:

(1) has been lawfully admitted to the United States for permanent residence under the Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Section 1101 et seq.); and

(2) as a condition of that admission, was sponsored by another individual who executed an affidavit of support on the lawfully admitted individual's behalf.

(b) This section applies only with respect to the following benefits programs:

(1) the child health plan program under Chapter 62, Health and Safety Code;

(2) the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code;

(3) Medicaid; and

(4) the supplemental nutrition assistance program under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code.

(c) If an individual states at the time of application for benefits under a program to which this section applies that the individual is a sponsored alien, the commission:

(1) shall make a reasonable effort to notify the individual that the commission may seek reimbursement from the individual's sponsor for any program benefits the individual receives; and

(2) may, to the extent allowed by federal law and using an automated system where available, verify information relating to the sponsorship after the individual is determined eligible for and begins receiving program benefits.

(d) If the commission verifies that an individual who receives benefits under a program to which this section applies is a sponsored alien and determines that seeking reimbursement is cost-effective, the commission may seek reimbursement from the individual's sponsor for the program benefits provided to the individual to the extent allowed by federal law.

(e) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section, including rules that specify the most cost-effective procedures by which the commission may seek reimbursement under Subsection (d).

(f) Nothing in this section adds to or changes the eligibility requirements for a benefits program to which this section applies.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0104. CALL CENTERS. (a) If cost-effective, the executive commissioner by rule shall establish at least one but not more than four call centers to determine and certify or recertify an individual's eligibility and need for services related to the following programs:

(1) the child health plan program;

(2) the financial assistance program under Chapter 31, Human Resources Code;

(3) Medicaid;

(4) nutritional assistance programs under Chapter 33, Human Resources Code;

(5) long-term care services, as defined by Section 22.0011, Human Resources Code;

(6) community-based support services identified or provided in accordance with Subchapter D, Chapter 546; and

(7) other health and human services programs, as appropriate.

(b) The commission shall contract with at least one but not more than four private entities to operate the call centers unless the commission determines that contracting would not be cost-effective.

(c) Each call center:

(1) must be located in this state, except that this subdivision does not prohibit a call center located in this state from processing overflow calls through a center located in another state; and

(2) shall provide translation services as required by federal law for consumers who are unable to speak, hear, or comprehend the English language.

(d) The commission shall develop consumer service and performance standards for the operation of each call center and make those standards available to the public. The standards must address a call center's:

(1) ability to serve consumers in a timely manner, including consideration of:

(A) consumers' ability to access the call center;

(B) whether the call center has toll-free telephone access;

(C) the average amount of time a consumer spends on hold;

(D) the frequency of call transfers;

(E) whether a consumer is able to communicate with a live individual at the call center; and

(F) whether the call center makes mail correspondence available;

(2) staff, including employee courtesy, friendliness, training, and knowledge about the programs listed under Subsection (a); and

(3) complaint handling procedures, including:

(A) the level of difficulty involved in filing a complaint; and

(B) whether the call center's complaint responses are timely.

(e) The commission shall develop:

(1) mechanisms for measuring consumer service satisfaction; and

(2) performance measures to evaluate whether each call center meets the standards the commission develops under Subsection (d).

(f) The commission may inspect a call center and analyze the call center's consumer service performance through a consumer service evaluator posing as a consumer.

(g) Notwithstanding Subsection (a), the executive commissioner shall develop and implement policies that provide an applicant for services related to a program listed under Subsection (a) with an opportunity to appear in person to establish initial eligibility or comply with periodic eligibility recertification requirements if the applicant requests a personal interview. In implementing the policies, the commission shall maintain offices to serve applicants who request a personal interview. This subsection does not affect a law or rule that requires an applicant to appear in person to establish initial eligibility or comply with periodic eligibility recertification requirements.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER D. ADMINISTRATIVE AND JUDICIAL REVIEW OF CERTAIN PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS DECISIONS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0151. DEFINITION. In this subchapter, "public assistance benefits" means benefits provided under a public assistance program under Chapter 31, 32, or 33, Human Resources Code.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0152. ELECTRONIC RECORDING OF HEARING. A hearing conducted by the commission, or by a health and human services agency to which the commission delegates a function related to public assistance benefits, that relates to a decision regarding public assistance benefits that is contested by an applicant for or recipient of the benefits must be recorded electronically.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0153. ADMINISTRATIVE REVIEW. (a) Before an applicant for or recipient of public assistance benefits may appeal a decision of a hearing officer for the commission or a health and human services agency related to those benefits and in accordance with rules of the executive commissioner, the applicant or recipient must request an administrative review by an appropriate attorney of the commission or a health and human services agency, as applicable.

(b) Not later than the 15th business day after the date the appropriate attorney described by Subsection (a) receives the request for administrative review, the attorney shall:

(1) complete an administrative review of the decision; and

(2) notify the applicant or recipient in writing of the results of that review.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0154. JUDICIAL REVIEW. (a) An appeal of a decision made by a hearing officer for the commission or a health and human services agency related to public assistance benefits brought by an applicant for or recipient of the benefits:

(1) is governed by Subchapters G and H, Chapter 2001, except as provided by this subchapter; and

(2) takes precedence over all civil cases except workers' compensation and unemployment compensation cases.

(b) For purposes of Section 2001.171, an applicant for or recipient of public assistance benefits has exhausted all available administrative remedies and a decision, including a decision under Section 31.034 or 32.035, Human Resources Code, is final and appealable on the date that, after a hearing:

(1) the hearing officer for the commission or a health and human services agency reaches a final decision related to the benefits; and

(2) the appropriate attorney completes an administrative review of the decision and notifies the applicant or recipient in writing of the results of that review.

(c) For purposes of Section 2001.171, an applicant for or recipient of public assistance benefits is not required to file a motion for rehearing with the commission or a health and human services agency, as applicable.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 2001.177, the cost of preparing the record and transcript of a hearing described by Section 545.0152 that is required to be sent to a reviewing court may not be charged to the applicant for or recipient of the public assistance benefits.

(e) Judicial review of a decision described by Subsection (a) is:

(1) instituted by filing a petition with a district court in Travis County, as provided by Subchapter G, Chapter 2001; and

(2) under the substantial evidence rule.

(f) The appellee is the commission.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

SUBCHAPTER E. CERTAIN PUBLIC ASSISTANCE BENEFITS PROGRAM PROVIDERS

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0201. COMPLIANCE WITH SOLICITATION PROHIBITIONS. (a) In this section, "furnish" and "provider" have the meanings assigned by Section 544.0001.

(b) A provider who furnishes Medicaid or child health plan program services is subject to Chapter 102, Occupations Code. The provider's compliance with that chapter is a condition of the provider's eligibility to participate as a provider under those programs.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0202. MARKETING ACTIVITIES BY MEDICAID OR CHILD HEALTH PLAN PROGRAM PROVIDERS. (a) A Medicaid or child health plan program provider, including a provider participating in the network of a managed care organization that contracts with the commission to provide services under Medicaid or the child health plan program, may not engage in any marketing activity, including engaging in the dissemination of material or another attempt to communicate, that:

(1) involves unsolicited personal contact with a Medicaid recipient or a parent whose child is a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee, including by:

(A) door-to-door solicitation;

(B) solicitation at a child-care facility or other type of facility;

(C) direct mail; or

(D) telephone;

(2) is directed at an individual solely because the individual is a Medicaid recipient or is a parent of a child who is a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee; and

(3) is intended to influence the Medicaid recipient's or parent's choice of provider.

(b) A provider participating in the network of a managed care organization that contracts with the commission to provide services under Medicaid or the child health plan program must comply with the marketing guidelines the commission establishes under Section 540.0055.

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits:

(1) a Medicaid or child health plan program provider from:

(A) engaging in a marketing activity, including engaging in the dissemination of material or another attempt to communicate, that is intended to influence the choice of provider by a Medicaid recipient or a parent whose child is a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee, if the marketing activity:

(i) is conducted at a community-sponsored educational event, health fair, outreach activity, or other similar community or nonprofit event in which the provider participates and does not involve unsolicited personal contact or promotion of the provider's practice; or

(ii) involves only the general dissemination of information, including by television, radio, newspaper, or billboard advertisement, and does not involve unsolicited personal contact;

(B) as permitted under the provider's contract, engaging in the dissemination of material or another attempt to communicate with a Medicaid recipient or a parent whose child is a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee, including communication in person or by direct mail or telephone, to:

(i) provide an appointment reminder;

(ii) distribute promotional health materials;

(iii) provide information about the types of services the provider offers; or

(iv) coordinate patient care; or

(C) engaging in a marketing activity that the provider has submitted for review and for which the provider has received a notice of prior authorization under Subsection (d); or

(2) a STAR+PLUS Medicaid managed care program provider from, as permitted under the provider's contract, engaging in a marketing activity, including engaging in the dissemination of material or another attempt to communicate, that is intended to educate a Medicaid recipient about available long-term services and supports.

(d) The commission shall establish a process by which a provider may submit a proposed marketing activity for review and prior authorization to ensure that the provider is in compliance with the requirements of this section and, if applicable, Section 540.0055, or to determine whether the provider is exempt from a requirement of this section and, if applicable, Section 540.0055. The commission may grant or deny a provider's request for authorization to engage in a proposed marketing activity.

(e) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules as necessary to implement this section, including rules relating to provider marketing activities that are exempt from the requirements of this section and, if applicable, Section 540.0055.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0203. REIMBURSEMENT CLAIMS FOR CERTAIN MEDICAID OR CHILD HEALTH PLAN SERVICES INVOLVING SUPERVISED PROVIDERS. (a) In this section, "national provider identifier" means the national provider identifier required under Section 1128J(e), Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Section 1320a-7k(e)).

(b) If a Medicaid or child health plan program provider, including a nurse practitioner or physician assistant, provides a referral or orders health care services for a Medicaid recipient or child health plan program enrollee at the direction or under the supervision of another provider and the referral or order is based on the supervised provider's evaluation of the recipient or enrollee, the names and associated national provider identifier numbers of the supervised provider and the supervising provider must be included on any claim for reimbursement a provider submits based on the referral or order.

(c) The executive commissioner shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.

Text of section effective on April 01, 2025

Sec. 545.0204. PARTICIPATION OF DIAGNOSTIC LABORATORY SERVICE PROVIDERS IN CERTAIN PROGRAMS. Notwithstanding any other law, a diagnostic laboratory may participate as an in-state provider under any program a health and human services agency or the commission administers that involves diagnostic laboratory services, regardless of the location where any specific service is performed or where the laboratory's facilities are located, if:

(1) the laboratory or an entity that is a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the laboratory maintains diagnostic laboratory operations in this state;

(2) the laboratory and each entity that is a parent, subsidiary, or other affiliate of the laboratory collectively employ at least 1,000 individuals at places of employment located in this state;

(3) the laboratory is otherwise qualified to provide the services under the program; and

(4) the laboratory is not prohibited from participating as a provider under any benefits program a health and human services agency or the commission administers based on conduct that constitutes fraud, waste, or abuse.

Added by Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 769 (H.B. 4611), Sec. 1.01, eff. April 1, 2025.